Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2 Enforcement

Cross references.

Powers and duties of agents of Georgia Bureau of Investigation relating to enforcement of laws pertaining to manufacture and transportation of liquor, wine, beer, and other alcoholic beverages, §

35-3-8

.

Enforcement of revenue laws generally, §

48-2-80

et seq.

3-2-30.
Powers and duties of special agents and enforcement officers of department generally; bond requirement; retention of weapon and badge upon retirement or disability.

Persons appointed by the commissioner as special agents or enforcement officers of the department, in the enforcement of this title and other laws of this state with respect to the manufacture, transportation, distribution, sale, storage, or possession of alcoholic beverages, shall have the authority throughout the state to:

Obtain and execute warrants for arrest of persons charged with violations of such laws;

Obtain and execute search warrants in the enforcement of such laws;

Arrest without warrant any person violating such laws in the officer’s presence or within his immediate knowledge when there is likely to be a failure of enforcement of such laws for want of a judicial officer to issue a warrant;

Make investigations in the enforcement of such laws and, in connection with the investigations, to go upon any property outside of buildings, posted or otherwise, in the performance of official duties;

Seize and take possession of all property which is declared contraband under such laws; and

Carry firearms while performing their duties.

Each special agent or enforcement officer shall file with the commissioner a public official’s bond in the amount of $1,000.00, the cost of which shall be paid by the department.

Nothing in this title shall be construed so as to relieve any special agent or enforcement officer, after making an arrest, from the duties imposed generally to obtain a warrant promptly and, without undue delay, to return arrested persons before a person authorized to examine, commit, or receive bail, as required by general law.

After an agent or enforcement officer has accumulated 25 years of service with the department, upon leaving the department under honorable conditions, such agent or enforcement officer shall be entitled as part of such officer’s compensation to retain his or her weapon and badge pursuant to regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

As used in this subsection, the term “disability” means a disability that prevents an individual from working as a law enforcement officer. When a special agent or an enforcement officer leaves the department as a result of a disability arising in the line of duty, such special agent or an enforcement officer shall be entitled as part of such officer’s compensation to retain his or her weapon and badge in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 135, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 5A-350, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1074, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 1058, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 3/HB 95.

3-2-31.
Assistance to other authorities by special agents and enforcement officers of department.

Upon a request by the governing authority of any municipality or county, the sheriff or chief of a county police force, the judge of the superior court of any county, or the Governor, the commissioner, in unusual circumstances, may and, in the case of an order from the Governor, shall direct special agents and enforcement officers of the department to render assistance in:

Any criminal case;

The prevention of violations of law; or

Detecting and apprehending those violating any criminal laws of this state, any other state, or the United States.

This Code section shall not apply solely to agents who enforce this title but shall apply to all agents of the department with law enforcement powers.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1490, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-351, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-2-32.
Inspection of premises by commissioner and agents generally; access to books, records, and supplies.

The commissioner and his agents may enter upon the licensed premises of any person engaged in the manufacture, transportation, distribution, sale, storage, or possession of alcoholic beverages at any time for the purpose of inspecting the premises and enforcing this title and shall have access during the inspection to all books, records, and supplies relating to the manufacture, transportation, distribution, sale, storage, or possession of alcoholic beverages.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 8; Code 1933, § 58-817, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-352, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-2-33.
Sale, possession, concealment, storage, or conveyance of untaxed alcoholic beverages; declaration of untaxed or otherwise unlawful alcoholic beverages as contraband; seizure and disposition of contraband alcoholic beverages.

Except as otherwise specifically provided for by law, it is unlawful for any person to sell, possess, conceal, store, or convey any alcoholic beverage on which any tax or license fee imposed by this title has not been paid.

Any peace officer or authorized agent of the commissioner shall declare as contraband any alcoholic beverage:

Not reported for collection of taxes under a reporting system established by the commissioner;

Found in any county, municipality, or unincorporated area of any county where the sale of alcoholic beverages is not lawful when the alcoholic beverage is intended for use or sale contrary to law; or

Sold, conveyed, or possessed, concealed, stored, or held for sale by any person who has not first obtained all licenses required by this title.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, all contraband alcoholic beverages seized shall be immediately delivered to the commissioner or to persons designated by him to receive the contraband alcoholic beverages.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-354, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 14; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1118, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 5/HB 1248.

Editor’s notes.

In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, annotations decided under former Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103 are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Cross references.

Possession, sale, or purchase of unstamped distilled spirits, §

3-3-29

.

Seizure and disposition as contraband of cigars and cigarettes on which taxes not paid or on which stamps do not appear, §

48-11-9

.

3-2-34.
Disposition of contraband alcoholic beverages; seizure; destruction; sale; retention of small quantity for evidence.

All alcoholic beverages upon which no taxes have been paid to this state or any other state and which are not specifically exempt from the taxes imposed by law shall be destroyed by the peace officer or agent of the commissioner seizing the beverages, except that a small quantity of the illicit alcoholic beverage may be retained for purposes of evidence in the proper court; and then the illicit alcoholic beverage shall be destroyed immediately.

All contraband alcoholic beverages upon which the taxes have been paid either to this state or to any other state shall be either destroyed or sold at public sale as provided by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-355, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 15.

Cross references.

Seizure and disposition as contraband of cigars and cigarettes on which taxes not paid or on which stamps do not appear, §

48-11-9

.

3-2-35.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See notes.] Seizure of contraband by commissioner and agents; proceedings upon seizure; hearing on entitlement to seized items; appeals; disposition of items upon which taxes have been paid.

The commissioner and his agents shall seize and take possession of any contraband found in the possession of any person in violation of this title.

Upon seizure, the commissioner or his agent shall give a receipt to the person from whom the contraband property was seized, if known, identifying the property seized and indicating from whom seized and the place of seizure.

A copy of the receipt shall be:

Filed in the office of the commissioner and shall be a public record open to public inspection; and

Posted at the courthouse of the county in which the contraband was seized.

Any person desiring to make claim to the contraband property shall file a claim with the commissioner at his office in Atlanta within ten days from the day of seizure. The commissioner, within 30 days of receipt of any such claim, shall afford the claimant a hearing in which to show his entitlement to the seized items. The burden of proof at such hearing shall be upon the claimant to establish his claim to the items seized and to show compliance with or justification for noncompliance with this Code section. The commissioner shall enter a written order granting or denying the claim within 30 days from the date of the hearing.

An appeal from the commissioner’s order may be taken to the Superior Court of Fulton County by filing with the commissioner, within 15 days from the date of the decision, a notice of appeal to the Superior Court of Fulton County. The appeal shall be based upon the record made before the commissioner; and the commissioner, upon the filing of a notice of appeal, shall transmit the record and appropriate documents to the superior court within 30 days from the date of the filing of notice of appeal. The superior court shall review the record for errors of law, violation of constitutional or statutory provisions, violation of the statutory authority of the agency, lawfulness of the procedure, lack of any evidence to support the decision, and arbitrariness and abuse of discretion. However, the court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the hearing officer as to the weight of evidence on questions of fact.

All alcoholic beverages upon which the taxes have been paid to either this state or any other state shall be disposed of as follows:

In the case of malt beverage, the seized goods shall be destroyed by the commissioner or his authorized agent;

In the case of wine, the seized goods shall be sold by the commissioner at public sale, except that, where seized wine is determined by the commissioner to be unfit for human consumption, it shall be destroyed;

In the case of distilled spirits, the seized goods shall be sold by the commissioner at public sale, except that, where seized distilled spirits are determined by the commissioner to be unfit for human consumption, the distilled spirits shall be destroyed.

This Code section shall not apply to unlawfully manufactured alcoholic beverages.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-356, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 16; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 3.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 3-2-35 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

Editor’s notes.

In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, annotations decided under former Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103 are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Cross references.

Seizure and disposition as contraband of cigars and cigarettes on which taxes not paid or on which stamps do not appear, §

48-11-9

.

3-2-35.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See notes.] Seizure of contraband by commissioner and agents; proceedings upon seizure; hearing on entitlement to seized items; appeals; disposition of items upon which taxes have been paid.

The commissioner and his agents shall seize and take possession of any contraband found in the possession of any person in violation of this title.

Upon seizure, the commissioner or his agent shall give a receipt to the person from whom the contraband property was seized, if known, identifying the property seized and indicating from whom seized and the place of seizure.

A copy of the receipt shall be:

Filed in the office of the commissioner and shall be a public record open to public inspection; and

Posted at the courthouse of the county in which the contraband was seized.

Any person desiring to make claim to the contraband property shall file a claim with the commissioner at his office in Atlanta within ten days from the day of seizure. The commissioner, within 30 days of receipt of any such claim, shall afford the claimant a hearing in which to show his entitlement to the seized items. The burden of proof at such hearing shall be upon the claimant to establish his claim to the items seized and to show compliance with or justification for noncompliance with this Code section. The commissioner shall enter a written order granting or denying the claim within 30 days from the date of the hearing.

An appeal from the commissioner’s order may be taken to the Superior Court of Fulton County by filing with the commissioner, within 15 days from the date of the decision, a copy of the petition for review filed in the Superior Court of Fulton County. The proceedings on the petition for review shall be governed by Chapter 3 of Title 5 except as provided otherwise in this Code section. The appeal shall be based upon the record made before the commissioner. The commissioner shall transmit the record and appropriate documents to the superior court within 30 days after the date the petition for review is received. The superior court shall review the record for errors of law, violation of constitutional or statutory provisions, violation of the statutory authority of the agency, lawfulness of the procedure, lack of any evidence to support the decision, and arbitrariness and abuse of discretion. However, the court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the hearing officer as to the weight of evidence on questions of fact.

All alcoholic beverages upon which the taxes have been paid to either this state or any other state shall be disposed of as follows:

In the case of malt beverage, the seized goods shall be destroyed by the commissioner or his authorized agent;

In the case of wine, the seized goods shall be sold by the commissioner at public sale, except that, where seized wine is determined by the commissioner to be unfit for human consumption, it shall be destroyed;

In the case of distilled spirits, the seized goods shall be sold by the commissioner at public sale, except that, where seized distilled spirits are determined by the commissioner to be unfit for human consumption, the distilled spirits shall be destroyed.

This Code section shall not apply to unlawfully manufactured alcoholic beverages.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-356, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 16; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 3; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-1/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 3-2-35 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, in subsection (e), substituted “copy of the petition for review filed in” for “notice of appeal to” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, and substituted the present third and fourth sentences for: “The appeal shall be based upon the record made before the commissioner; and the commissioner, upon the filing of a notice of appeal, shall transmit the record and appropriate documents to the superior court within 30 days from the date of the filing of notice of appeal.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.

3-2-36.
Arrest and prosecution of violators of title.

The commissioner or his agents shall secure warrants or other criminal process against any person who violates any provision of this title in counties and municipalities where the sale of alcoholic beverages is not authorized and in counties and municipalities where the sale of alcoholic beverages is authorized but where the alcoholic beverages are being sold contrary to law. The commissioner or his agents shall prosecute such offenders.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 17; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 8; Code 1933, § 5A-353, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 13.